Maryland, session 2025, SB0152.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Law
10–603.
Sections 10–601 through 10–608 and 10–626 of this subtitle do not apply to:
(1) customary and normal veterinary and agricultural husbandry practices
including dehorning, castration, tail docking, and limit feeding;
(2) research conducted in accordance with protocols approved by an animal
care and use committee, as required under the federal Animal Welfare Act or the federal
Health Research Extension Act;
– 1 –

Ch. 157 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) an activity that may cause unavoidable physical pain to an animal[,
including food processing, pest elimination, animal training, and hunting,] if the person
performing the activity uses the most humane method reasonably available, INCLUDING:
(I) FOOD PROCESSING;
(II) PEST ELIMINATION;
(III) ANIMAL TRAINING; AND
(IV) ANY HUNTING OR FISHING ACTIVITY COMPLETED IN
ACCORDANCE WITH TITLE 4 OR TITLE 10 OF THE NATURAL RESOURCES ARTICLE
OR ANY REGULATIONS ADOPTED UNDER THOSE TITLES; or
(4) normal human activities in which the infliction of pain to an animal is
purely incidental and unavoidable.
10–627.
(A) FOR THE PURPOSES OF THIS SUBTITLE, EACH ANIMAL HARMED IN A
VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE IS A SEPARATE OFFENSE AND SHALL BE DEEMED AN
INDIVIDUAL VICTIM FOR PURPOSES OF THE SENTENCING GUIDELINES STACKING
RULE.
(B) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER LAW, A CONVICTION UNDER THIS
SUBTITLE MAY NOT MERGE WITH A CONVICTION FOR ANY OTHER CRIME BASED ON
THE ACT ESTABLISHING THE VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(C) A SENTENCE IMPOSED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE MAY BE SEPARATE FROM
AND CONSECUTIVE TO OR CONCURRENT WITH A SENTENCE FOR ANY CRIME BASED
ON THE ACT ESTABLISHING THE VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, April 22, 2025.
– 2 –